Utah statutes.
48-2c-1205.   Revocation of voluntary dissolution.

(1)  Where the event of dissolution is the written agreement of the members, a company may revoke its dissolution within 120 days after the effective date of the dissolution.

(2)  Revocation of the voluntary dissolution must be approved by all of the members.

(3)  After the revocation of voluntary dissolution is approved by all of the members, the company may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the division for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

(a)  the name of the company;

(b)  the effective date of the dissolution that was revoked; and

(c)  the date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized by the members.

(4)  Revocation of the voluntary dissolution is effective when the articles of revocation of dissolution are filed with the division.  A provision may not be made for a delayed effective date for revocation of voluntary dissolution.

(5)  When the revocation of voluntary dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the company may carry on its business as if the dissolution had never occurred.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

